Illinois, session 104th, SB2376.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 110-6.1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)7    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 8    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a-1), upon 9Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall hold a 10hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only if:11        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 12    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 13    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 14    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment, or 15    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 16    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 17    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 18    or persons or the community, based on the specific 19    articulable facts of the case;20        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 21    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 22    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 23    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible   SB2376- 2 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 2    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 3    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 4    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 5    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 6    of force against another person, residential burglary, 7    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 8    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 9    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or 10    disfigurement, or any other felony which involves the 11    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 12    disability or disfigurement; 13        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 14    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 15    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 16    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 17    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 18    of the threat upon which the charge is based;19        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 20    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 21    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 22    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 23    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or of a civil no contact 24    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 25    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 26    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person   SB2376- 3 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1    or persons or the community, based on the specific 2    articulable facts of the case;3        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 4    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 5    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 6    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 7    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 8    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 9    case;10        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 11    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 12    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 13    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 14    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 15    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 16    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 17    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 18    the case; 19        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 20    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 21    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 22    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 23    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 24    of the case:25            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 26        firearm);  SB2376- 4 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1            (B) Section 24-1.2-5 24-2.5 (aggravated discharge 2        of a machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 3        designed or used use for silencing the report of a 4        firearm);5            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 6        firearm);7            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 8        firearm by a repeat felony offender);9            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale, or transfer 10        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 11        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 12        or flechette shells);13            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 14        firearms);15            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 16        firearms on the premises of any school);17            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 18        liquor license);19            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 20        firearm);21            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);22            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);23            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);24            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 25        of a minor);26            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);  SB2376- 5 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 2        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 3        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 4        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 5        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 6        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 7            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 8        manslaughter);9            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);10            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);11            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 12        endangerment);13            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 14            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 15        restraint); 16            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 17            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 18        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 19        discharge of a firearm); 20        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 21    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 22    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the 23    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 24    the specific articulable facts of the case: 25            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 26        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel   SB2376- 6 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);2            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 3        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 4        influence while operating a school bus with 5        passengers);6            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 7        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 8        influence causing great bodily harm);9            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 10        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 11        influence after a previous reckless homicide 12        conviction);13            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 14        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 15        influence leading to death); or16            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 17        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 18        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 19        under the age of 16);20        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 21    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 22    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a 23    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 24    persons or the community, based on the specific 25    articulable facts of the case; or 26        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight   SB2376- 7 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:2            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 3        through (a)(7) of this Section; or4            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 5    (a-1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section 6to the contrary, a non-citizen of the United States who 7entered the United States without a legal visa issued by the 8United States Department of State and who has been charged in 9this State with an offense for which pretrial detention may be 10ordered by the court and, at the time of the commission of the 11offense, did not have a legal visa is not eligible for pretrial 12release and must be held in pretrial detention pending trial. 13    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 14detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 15probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 16a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 17been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 18indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 19probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 20finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 21misdemeanor.22    (c) Timing of petition. 23        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 24    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 25    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 26    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon   SB2376- 8 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 2    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 3    previously released shall not be detained.4        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 5    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 6    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 7    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 8    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 9    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 10    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 11    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 12    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 13    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 14    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 15    filing of the petition and the hearing.16    (d) Contents of petition.17        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 18    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 19    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 20    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 21    persons or the community, based on the specific 22    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.23        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 24    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 25    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 26    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the   SB2376- 9 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1    filing of the previous petition.2    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 3for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 4proving by clear and convincing evidence that:5        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 6    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 7    subsection (a), and8        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 9    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 10    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 11    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 12    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 13    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 14    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 15    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 16    1986, and17        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 18    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 19    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 20    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 21    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 22    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 23    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 24    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and25        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 26    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject   SB2376- 10 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 2    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 3    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 4    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 5    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 6    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 7    appear in court as required.8    (f) Conduct of the hearings.9        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 10    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 11    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 12    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 13    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 14    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 15    hearing.16        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 17    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.18        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 19    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 20    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 21    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 22    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 23    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 24    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 25    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 26    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an   SB2376- 11 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 2    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 3    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 4    conducted via a 2-way two-way audio-visual communication 5    system, such consultation shall not be recorded and shall 6    be undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 7        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 8    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 2-way 9    two-way audio visual communication) unless the accused 10    waives the right to be present physically in court, the 11    court determines that the physical health and safety of 12    any person necessary to the proceedings would be 13    endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of 14    the circuit orders use of that system due to operational 15    challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such 16    operational challenges must be documented and approved by 17    the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 18    challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented 19    and approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois 20    Courts every 6 months. 21        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 22    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 23    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 24    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 25    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 26    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a   SB2376- 12 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 2    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 3    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 4    the court shall state on the record the reason for 5    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 6    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 7    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 8    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 9    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 10    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 11    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 12    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 13    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 14    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 15    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 16    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 17    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 18    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 19    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 20    criminal history, if available, and any written or 21    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 22    statements made by any person, if in the State's 23    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 24        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 25    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 26    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial   SB2376- 13 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 2    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 3    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 4    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 5    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 6    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.7        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 8    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 9    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 10    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 11    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 12    the defendant.13        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 14    release, and detention prior to trial must be 15    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 16    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 17    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 18    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 19dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 20defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 21person or persons or the community, based on the specific 22articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 23limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:24        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 25    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 26    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.  SB2376- 14 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 2    including:3            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 4        history indicative of violent, abusive, or assaultive 5        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 6        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 7        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 8        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.9            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 10        psychiatric or other similar social history which 11        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 12        nature, or lack of any such history.13        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 14    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 15    nature of the threat.16        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 17    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 18    them.19        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.20        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 21    complaining witness. 22        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 23    access to any weapon or weapons.24        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 25    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 26    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release,   SB2376- 15 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1    or other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 2    appeal, or completion of sentence for an offense under 3    federal or State state law.4        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 5    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 6    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 7    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 8    or lack of such behavior.9    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 10detention:11        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 12    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 13    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 14    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 15    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 16    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 17    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;18        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 19    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 20    pending trial;21        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 22    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 23    communication with others of his or her choice by 24    visitation, mail and telephone; and25        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 26    required for appearances in connection with court   SB2376- 16 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1    proceedings.2    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 3detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 4Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 5offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 6on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 7is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 8the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 9release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 10any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 11the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 12from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 13good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.14    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 15before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 16is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 17of any person or persons or the community, based on the 18specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 19defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 20    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 21entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 22denying his or her pretrial release.23    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 24this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 25release.26    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section   SB2376- 17 -LRB104 09516 RLC 19579 b1shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 2defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 3proceedings.4    (m) Interest of victims. 5        (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 6    Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph 7    (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime 8    Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their 9    opportunity at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 10        (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the 11    court may impose a no contact provision with the victim or 12    other interested party that shall be enforced while the 13    defendant remains in custody. 14(Source: P.A. 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 15revised 10-23-24.)